Alaska, session 34, SB159.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 23.15.630(a) is amended to read: 05 (a) In the manner provided in AS 23.20, the department shall collect from 06 each employee an amount equal to .20 [ONE-TENTH OF ONE] percent of the wages, 07 as set out in AS 23.20.175, on which the employee is required to make contributions 08 under AS 23.20.290(d). The department shall remit to the Department of Revenue, in 09 accordance with AS 37.10.050, money collected under this subsection. 10 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 11 read: 12 APPLICABILITY. AS 23.15.630(a), as amended by sec. 1 of this Act, applies to 13 contracts entered into on or after the effective date of this Act. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.